Hawaii statutes.
[§551G-33] Effect of registration.
(a) Upon registration of a guardianship or protective order from another
state, the guardian or conservator may exercise in the State of Hawaii all
powers authorized in the order of appointment except as prohibited under the
laws of the State of Hawaii, including maintaining actions and proceedings in
the State of Hawaii and, if the guardian or conservator is not a resident of
Hawaii, subject to any conditions imposed upon nonresident parties.

(b) A court of the State of Hawaii may grant
any relief available under this chapter and other law of the State of Hawaii to
enforce a registered order. [L 2012, c 236, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next